Maryland, session 2025, SB0973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
5–201.
(a) There is a Maryland Aviation Commission.
(b) The Commission shall:
(2) [Approve] ADOPT regulations for the operation of the State–owned
airports [prior to their adoption by the Executive Director];
(c) (1) The Commission shall consist of 13 voting members:
(i) 12 appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the
Senate:
1. Two of whom shall be recommended by the Anne Arundel
County Senate Delegation; and
2. Two of whom shall be recommended by the Howard
County Senate Delegation; and
(ii) The Secretary of Transportation, who shall be the [Chairman]
CHAIR of the Commission.
(2) The Secretary of Commerce shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio
Commission member.
(f) (1) The Commission shall meet at a time and place designated by the
[Chairman] CHAIR of the Commission.
(2) The Commission shall meet as often as its duties require, but [not less
than quarterly] SHALL HOLD AT LEAST 10 MEETINGS EACH YEAR, OF WHICH FOUR
MEETINGS MAY BE MEETINGS OF SUBCOMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION
DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR.
(3) (i) Attendance by [five] A MAJORITY OF THE VOTING members
shall constitute a quorum.

SENATE BILL 973 3
(ii) No formal action may be taken by the Commission except by an
affirmative vote of a majority of the entire Commission.
5–201.1.
(b) Actions of the Commission which, in the judgment of the [Chairman] CHAIR,
have an impact upon the Transportation Trust Fund are subject to the approval of the
[Chairman] CHAIR.
(c) The [Chairman] CHAIR of the Commission shall:
(1) Based on the advice of the Commission and subject to the approval of
the Governor, appoint the Executive Director of the Administration in accordance with §
5–501 of the General Provisions Article; and
(2) Approve the Administration’s budget before its submission for the
Governor’s approval and inclusion in the proposed budget submitted to the General
Assembly.
(d) The [Chairman] CHAIR of the Commission with the advice of the Commission
may remove the Executive Director of the Administration.
5–202.1.
(a) The head of the Administration is the Executive Director.
(b) (1) The Executive Director shall report directly to the Commission.
(2) Subject to the direction of the Commission and in accordance with other
provisions of law, the Executive Director is responsible for CARRYING OUT:
(i) [Carrying out the] THE powers and duties vested by law in the
Administration; and
(ii) [Adopting and carrying out regulations] REGULATIONS
ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION.
(c) The Executive Director is entitled to the salary provided in the State budget.
5–204.
(a) In addition to the specific powers granted and duties imposed by this title,
AND SUBJECT TO THE SUPERVISION OF THE COMMISSION, the Administration has the
powers and duties set forth in this section.

SENATE BILL 973
(d) With the approval of the Secretary, the Administration may:
(1) Recommend necessary legislation to advance the interests of this State
in aeronautics;
(2) Represent this State in aeronautics matters before any agency of this
or any other state or of the federal government;
(3) Participate on behalf of this State or any political subdivision or citizen
of this State as party plaintiff or defendant or as intervenor in any controversy that involves
the interest of this State in aeronautics; and
(4) [Adopt] PROPOSE FOR ADOPTION BY THE COMMISSION rules and
regulations for the functioning and administration of the Administration.
5–208.
(a) (1) The [Administration] COMMISSION may perform any act, issue and
amend any order, adopt and amend any general or special rule, regulation, or procedure,
and establish any minimum standard consistent with this title and necessary:
(i) To perform its duties and carry out the provisions of this title;
(ii) To protect the general public safety, the safety of persons who
operate, use, or travel in aircraft, the safety of persons who receive instructions in flying or
ground subjects that relate to aeronautics, or the safety of persons and property on land or
water; or
(iii) To develop and promote aeronautics in this State.
(2) The [Administration] COMMISSION may adopt rules and regulations
by which a person engaging in aeronautics may be required to establish financial
responsibility for any damage or injury that might be caused by the person.
(3) (i) The [Administration] COMMISSION shall adopt rules and
regulations requiring the use of security identification badges in airports consistent with
any airport security program regulations adopted under this section.
(ii) After notice and opportunity for a hearing as provided under §
5–210 of this subtitle, the Administration may order a civil penalty not exceeding $1,000
for the misuse of a security identification badge in violation of an airport security program
adopted under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(b) (1) A rule or regulation adopted by the [Administration] COMMISSION
may not apply to any airport, airport facility, or air navigation facility that is owned or
operated by the United States.

SENATE BILL 973 5
(2) A rule, regulation, order, or standard of the [Administration]
COMMISSION may not be inconsistent with or contrary to federal law.
(c) Copies of all rules, regulations, and standards shall be filed in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act and the State Documents Law and shall be made
available to the public.
5–209.
(a) The Executive Director or any officer or employee of the Administration
designated by the Executive Director may conduct investigations, inquiries, and hearings
as to:
(1) Any matter covered by this title or by a rule, regulation, or order of the
Administration OR COMMISSION; or
(2) Any aeronautics accident in this State.
5–213.
(a) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Administration may make any contract necessary for or incidental to the performance of
its duties and the exercise of its powers under this title.
(2) A CONTRACT INVOLVING CONSIDERATION EXCEEDING $1,000,000
MUST BE APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION IN A PUBLIC MEETING BEFORE THE
CONTRACT MAY BECOME EFFECTIVE.
5–413.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE SECRETARY, WITH THE
ADVICE OF THE COMMISSION, SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO GOVERN THE
MASTER PLAN PROCESS FOR BALTIMORE–WASHINGTON INTERNATIONAL
THURGOOD MARSHALL AIRPORT.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(I) DEFINE MAJOR AIRPORT PROJECTS;
(II) REQUIRE THAT A MASTER PLAN INCLUDE MAJOR AIRPORT
PROJECTS PLANNED FOR THE NEXT 10 YEARS;
(III) REQUIRE AT LEAST TWO PUBLIC HEARINGS AND A PUBLIC
COMMENT PERIOD BEFORE ADOPTION OF A MASTER PLAN;

SENATE BILL 973
(IV) REQUIRE PUBLIC DISTRIBUTION OF A PROPOSED MASTER
PLAN, INCLUDING THE DISTRIBUTION OF COPIES OF A PROPOSED MASTER PLAN TO
EACH COUNTY THAT IS WITHIN THE BALTIMORE–WASHINGTON INTERNATIONAL
THURGOOD MARSHALL AIRPORT NOISE ZONE; AND
(V) REQUIRE AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC HEARING:
1. BEFORE CONSTRUCTION BEGINS ON A MAJOR
AIRPORT PROJECT; OR
2. WHEN THERE IS A PROPOSAL TO ADD A MAJOR
AIRPORT PROJECT TO THE MASTER PLAN.
(3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ADOPT A MASTER PLAN CONSISTENT WITH THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 10 YEARS, THE COMMISSION SHALL
UPDATE THE MASTER PLAN CONSISTENT WITH THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION.
5–804.
(a) With the endorsement of the Secretary and the Secretary of the Environment
and after a public hearing following 60 days’ notice, the Executive Director shall adopt
regulations that establish limits for cumulative noise exposure for residential and other
land uses on the basis of the noise sensitivity of a given land use.
(b) In adopting limits under this section, the Executive Director shall:
(1) Consider:
(i) The general health and welfare;
(ii) The rights of property owners;
(iii) Accepted scientific and professional standards; and
(iv) The recommendations of the Federal Aviation Administration
and Environmental Protection Agency; and
(2) Set the limits at the most restrictive level that, through the application
of the best available technology at a reasonable cost and without impairing the safety of
flight, is consistent with attaining the environmental noise standards adopted by the
Maryland Department of Health.

SENATE BILL 973 7
(C) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, THE SECRETARY OF THE ENVIRONMENT,
AND THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS
SECTION EVERY 5 YEARS TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE REGULATIONS NEED TO BE
UPDATED.
5–806.
(a) (1) As to each noise abatement plan the Executive Director approves, the
airport operator shall:
(i) Begin to carry out the plan within 6 months of its approval; and
(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, fully carry
out the plan within 18 months of its approval.
(2) The Executive Director may grant a delay of up to 2 years to carry out
the plan fully if the Executive Director finds that, despite the good faith efforts of the
operator, the operator cannot comply with the schedule required by this subsection.
(b) After notice and a public hearing, the Executive Director shall certify and
publish, as a noise zone for purposes of Parts III and IV of this subtitle, any noise zone that
results from an approved assessment or an approved plan.
(c) On application by the airport operator or an affected political subdivision, the
Executive Director shall consider any adjustment to an approved plan or noise zone that is
needed to reflect potential operational changes, changes in adjoining land uses, or other
factors. Adjustments may be made only by recertification of the noise zone by the Executive
Director, after notice and a public hearing.
(d) Before any hearing under this section, the Executive Director shall give the
chief executive officer and zoning board of any affected political subdivision an opportunity
to comment. After certification of a noise zone, the Administration shall notify them of the
certified noise zone.
(e) The Executive Director may adopt rules and regulations for monitoring
compliance with approved plans.
(F) AT LEAST ANNUALLY, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL BRIEF THE
COMMISSION AT A PUBLIC HEARING ON THE STATUS OF NOISE ABATEMENT PLANS
ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION AND ANY POTENTIAL ISSUES WITH COMPLIANCE
WITH THE PLANS.
5–820.

SENATE BILL 973
(a) After the Executive Director certifies and publishes a noise zone for a
State–owned airport, [he] THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR shall [adopt] PROPOSE FOR
ADOPTION BY THE COMMISSION, administer, and enforce regulations for the airport in
the same manner that a political subdivision enforces its regulations under Part III of this
subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.